Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Handicapped Housing Authorization Act of 1977

13-23-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Handicapped Housing Authorization Act of 1977.”

Acts 1977, ch. 236, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2341.

13-23-202. Loans for residential housing for elderly and persons with disabilities authorized.

The Tennessee housing development agency is hereby authorized to make, or participate in the making of, construction and permanent mortgage loans to sponsors, builders, and developers of residential housing for persons who are elderly or have a disability, without respect to the requirements of §§ 13-23-116 and 13-23-117; provided, that no such loan or loans shall be made unless:

The United States or an instrumentality thereof has committed to provide housing assistance payments in connection with the housing development; and

Appropriate agencies of state government have entered into agreements with the Tennessee housing development agency to provide support services in connection with the housing development.

Acts 1977, ch. 236, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2342; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

13-23-203. Educational, vocational, therapeutic, medical and other services for residents.

All affected agencies of state government are hereby authorized to enter into interagency agreements with the Tennessee housing development agency to provide educational, vocational, therapeutic, medical, or other services on behalf of residents of housing developments financed pursuant to this part.

Acts 1977, ch. 236, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-2343.

13-23-204. Maximum amount of loan.

The maximum mortgage amount for a development financed by the Tennessee housing development agency pursuant to this part shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000).

Acts 1977, ch. 236, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-2344.

13-23-205. Part definitions.

The words and terms used in this part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the same meaning as provided in § 13-23-103.

Acts 1977, ch. 236, § 5; T.C.A., § 13-2345.

13-23-206. Inconsistencies with other laws.

Insofar as this part is inconsistent with any other law, this part is controlling.

Acts 1977, ch. 236, § 6; T.C.A., § 13-2346.